Utah statutes.
59-2-309.   Property escaping assessment -- Duties of assessing authority --
Property willfully concealed -- Penalties.
(1)  Any escaped property  may be assessed by the original assessing authority
at any time as far back as five years prior to the time of discovery, in which
case the assessor shall enter the assessments on the tax rolls and follow the
procedures established under Part 13 of this chapter.
(2)  Any property found to be willfully concealed, removed, transferred, or
misrepresented by its owner or agent in order to evade taxation is subject to
a penalty equal to the tax on its value, and neither the penalty nor
assessment may be reduced or waived by the assessor, county, county Board of
Equalization, or the commission, except pursuant to a procedure for the review
and approval of waivers adopted by county ordinance, or by administrative rule
adopted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
